California statutes. Education Code
(a) (1) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Sacramento County Office of Education shall utilize the funding appropriated in Item 6100-488 of Section 2.0 of the Budget Act of 2026 to develop both of the following:

(A) (i) Resources and provide technical assistance to support the implementation of alternative pathways and means to a diploma, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51225.3, Sections 51225.31 and 51225.32, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 56345.

(ii) Assistance provided pursuant to
 clause (i)
 shall include, but is not limited to, developing resources, training, and technical assistance to ensure coherence and consistency related to diploma attainment, secondary transition, and inclusive college programs, and the development of a statewide community of practice available to all local educational agencies to assist with implementation of alternative pathways to a high school diploma.

(B) Rubrics and sample alternate pupil work and performance tasks that are aligned to the content and performance levels of the domains of the English language development assessment identified or developed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2 and the statewide alternate assessment for English language proficiency pursuant to Section 11518.30 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations for each of
 the grades or grade spans assessed using that assessment to enable pupils who are English learners and have individualized education programs to demonstrate proficiency for purposes of reclassification pursuant to Section 313.5. The rubrics and sample alternate pupil work and performance tasks shall be completed and submitted to the department on or before January 1, 2028.

(2) Funding appropriated for purposes of this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2031.

(b) The department shall post the rubrics and sample alternate pupil work and performance tasks submitted pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) on the department’s internet website on or before June 30, 2028.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 619, Sec. 13.   (AB 2555)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.35.

(a) (1) If the governing board of a school district requires more than two courses in mathematics for graduation from high school, the governing board of the school district may award a pupil up to one mathematics course credit pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3 for successfully completing a “category C” approved computer science course.

(2) The governing board of a school district is encouraged to ensure that any computer science course that the school district awards a pupil mathematics course credit for pursuant to paragraph (1) builds upon fundamental mathematics content.

(3) The governing board of a school district is encouraged to support schools in submitting any computer science course that a school wishes to use to fulfill school district imposed mathematics subject area requirements to the University of California for certification and addition to the school’s “A–G” course list.

(b) For purposes of this section, “category C” refers to the “A–G” admission requirements for the California State University and the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 888, Sec. 3.   (AB 1764)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.36.

(a) If the governing board of a school district requires a course in health education for graduation from high school, the governing board of the school district shall include instruction in sexual harassment and violence, including, but not limited to, information on the affirmative consent standard, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 67386.

(b) If the governing board of a school district provides instruction pursuant to subdivision (a), the governing board of the school district shall ensure teachers consult information related to sexual harassment and violence in the Health Framework for California Public Schools when delivering health instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   (SB 695)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.37.

The department shall encourage the governing board of each school district, and the governing body of each charter school, whose schools offer world language courses that are specifically designed for native speakers that are not approved as “A–G” courses, to support their respective schools in submitting those courses to the University of California for certification and addition to the schools’ “A–G” course list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 72.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.38.

(a) If the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school requires a course in health education for graduation from high school, the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school shall include, commencing with the 2026–27 school year, instruction in the dangers associated with fentanyl use.

(b) Instruction provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be consistent with the state board’s most recently adopted “Health Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework) and based on information from the National Institutes of Health and the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
 Instruction shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Information on what fentanyl is, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) An explanation of the differences between synthetic opioids, nonsynthetic opioids, and illicit drugs.

(B) Variations of fentanyl.

(C) The differences between the legal and illegal uses of fentanyl.

(2) The risks of using fentanyl, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The lethal dose of fentanyl, including comparing that lethal dose of fentanyl to
 the lethal dose of other drugs.

(B) How often fentanyl is put into illegal drugs without a user’s knowledge.

(C) An explanation of what fentanyl does to a human body and the severity of fentanyl’s addictive properties.

(D) How the consumption of fentanyl can lead to hypoxia and an explanation of what hypoxia is and how it can affect the human body.

(3) An explanation of the process of adding or mixing fentanyl with other drugs, a process more commonly known as “lacing,” and why lacing with fentanyl is common.

(4) How to detect fentanyl in drugs and how to potentially save a person from a
 fentanyl overdose, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) How to buy and use fentanyl test strips.

(B) How to buy and use naloxone or other opioid antagonists in the form of a prefilled nasal product and an injection.

(C) How to detect if someone is overdosing on fentanyl.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 67, Sec. 1.   (AB 2429)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.4.

The governing board of each elementary school district shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction that it has adopted a policy to implement a course of instruction that sufficiently prepares the pupils in the district for the course of study required in Section 51225.3. This certification shall be submitted to the superintendent at the same time the district submits its apportionment reports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.5.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district maintaining a high school may confer honorary high school diplomas upon foreign exchange students from other countries who have not completed the course of study ordinarily required for graduation, and who are returning to their home countries following the completion of one academic school year in a school
 district in the state.

(2) The governing board of a school district, a county office of education, and the governing body of a charter school maintaining a high school may confer an honorary high school diploma upon a pupil who is terminally ill.

(b) An honorary high school diploma awarded pursuant to this section shall be clearly distinguishable from the regular diploma of graduation awarded by the school district, county office of education, or
 charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.6.

(a) If the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school requires a
 course in health education for graduation from high school, the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school shall include, commencing with the 2018–19 school year, instruction in performing compression-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR). This instruction shall include both of the following:

(1) An instructional program based on national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for the performance of compression-only CPR, such as those developed by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross.

(2) Instruction to pupils relative to the psychomotor skills necessary to perform compression-only CPR. For purposes of this paragraph, “psychomotor skills” means skills that pupils are required to perform as hands-on practice to support cognitive learning.

(b) Before the commencement of the 2017–18 school year, the department shall provide guidance on how to implement this section, including, but not limited to, who may provide instruction pursuant to this section.

(c) The governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school is encouraged to provide to pupils general information on the use and importance of an automated external defibrillator (AED). The physical presence of an AED in the classroom is not required.

(d) The governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school may adopt policies to implement this section.

(e) (1) The governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school providing instruction in performing
 compression-only CPR or information on the use of an AED pursuant to this section is encouraged to use the most cost-effective means possible to implement that requirement.

(2) This section shall not be construed to require the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school to make any purchases, including, but not limited to, purchasing an AED.

(f) (1) A local agency, entity of state or local government, or other public or private organization that sponsors, authorizes, supports, finances, or supervises the instruction of pupils in compression-only CPR or the use of an AED pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any civil damages alleged to result from the acts or omissions of an individual who received
 such instruction.

(2) A public employee who provides or facilitates the instruction of pupils in compression-only CPR or the use of an AED pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any civil damages alleged to result from the acts or omissions of an individual who received such instruction.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to grant immunity from civil damages to any person who provides or facilitates the instruction of pupils in compression-only CPR or the use of an AED in a manner that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 556, Sec. 1.   (AB 1719)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(2) “Opt-out form” means a form developed by the Student Aid Commission that permits parents, legal guardians, a legally emancipated pupil, a pupil who is 18 years of age or older, or a local educational agency on a pupil’s behalf to not fill out a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or California Dream Act Application for any reason.

(3) “Outreach program” means a nonprofit entity that is exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the United States
 Internal Revenue Code or a public entity with experience in either or both of the following:

(A) Assisting pupils with financial aid application completion.

(B) Serving pupils who are eligible to submit a California Dream Act Application.

(4) “Pupil” means a pupil in grade 12 attending a high school maintained by a local educational agency.

(5) “Transcript-informed pupil accounts” means accounts available to grade 9 to 12, inclusive, pupils that use data provided to the California College Guidance Initiative by local educational agencies, in accordance
 with data specified in the California High School Transcript and Student Record Portability Standard, as acknowledged by the Office of Cradle-to-Career Data.

(6) “Universal basic pupil accounts” means accounts available on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform for grade 6 to 12, inclusive, pupils that use data provided to the California College Guidance Initiative by the department that are not inclusive of courses and grades.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2022–23 school year, except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), the governing body of a local educational agency shall confirm that a pupil complies with at least one of the following:

(A) The pupil completes and submits to the United States Department of Education a Free Application for Federal Student Aid.

(B) If the pupil is exempt from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5, the pupil completes and submits to the Student Aid Commission a form established pursuant to Section 69508.5 for purposes of the California Dream Act.

(2) Commencing with the 2025–26 school year, the governing body of a local educational agency shall provide each pupil and the pupil’s parent or legal guardian with information about the California Kids Investment and Development Savings Program established pursuant to Article 19.5 (commencing with Section 69996) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 and the pupil’s potential eligibility for that benefit.

(c) The parent or legal guardian of the pupil, or the pupil if the pupil is a legally emancipated minor or 18 years of age or older, may opt out of the requirements of this section by filling out and submitting an opt-out form, as defined in subdivision (a), to the local educational agency. The Student Aid Commission shall make the opt-out form available to all local educational agencies pursuant to subdivision (h).

(d) (1) If the local educational agency determines that a pupil is unable to complete a requirement of this section, the local educational agency shall exempt the pupil or, if applicable, the pupil’s parent or legal guardian from completing and submitting a Free Application for Federal Student Aid, a form established pursuant to Section 69508.5 for purposes of the California Dream Act, or an opt-out form pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) (A) A local educational agency, before exempting the pupil or the pupil’s parent or legal guardian pursuant to paragraph (1), shall comply with both of the following:

(i) Provide the information described in subparagraph (B) to the pupil through a meeting between a school counselor and the pupil or, if no school counselor is employed at the school, between the pupil and other school staff, through written material, or
 by other means of communication.

(ii) Provide, to the pupil’s parent or legal guardian or the pupil if the pupil is a legally emancipated minor or 18 years of age or older, the information described in subparagraph (B) and notification of the date by which the pupil will be opted out by the local educational agency if no action is taken. This notice shall be provided with sufficient time for the parent or legal guardian or the pupil if the pupil is a legally emancipated minor or 18 years of age or older, to act before the local educational agency opts out the pupil.

(B) The information to be provided, as required in subparagraph (A), shall be all of the following:

(i) The purposes and benefits of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid or a form established pursuant to Section 69508.5, which include
 consideration for financial aid.

(ii) The consequences of not completing and submitting a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or a form established pursuant to Section 69508.5.

(iii) The option to complete a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or a form established pursuant to Section 69508.5 after an opt-out form has been submitted.

(3) If the local educational agency exempts the pupil from having to complete the requirements of this section, the local educational agency shall complete and submit the opt-out form, as defined in subdivision (a), on the pupil’s behalf and notify the pupil’s parent or legal guardian of the pupil’s exemption.

(e) The governing board or body of the local educational agency shall ensure both of the following:

(1) The local educational agency directs each high school pupil and, if applicable, the pupil’s parent or legal guardian to any support and assistance services necessary to comply with the requirement described in subdivision (b) that may be available through outreach programs, including, but not limited to, those programs operated by the Student Aid Commission, postsecondary immigration resource centers, college readiness organizations, community-based organizations, and legal resource organizations.

(2) Information shared by parents, legal guardians, and pupils under this section is handled in compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) and applicable state laws, including Chapters 493 and 495 of the Statutes of 2017, regardless of any person’s immigration status or other personal information, in order to protect all pupil
 and parent data to the fullest extent possible so that schools and all personal data remain safe.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that high school pupils have the support and assistance services to help pupils successfully complete and submit a Free Application for Federal Student Aid and the form established pursuant to Section 69508.5 for purposes of the California Dream Act.

(g) On or before September 1, 2022, and each year thereafter, the Student Aid Commission and the department shall facilitate the completion of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and the form established pursuant to Section 69508.5 for purposes of the California Dream Act in the following manner:

(1) The department shall share the current school year’s roster of pupils with the Student Aid Commission.

(2) The Student Aid Commission shall match the data described in paragraph (1) with a pupil’s application status based on the data possessed by the Student Aid Commission related to submission of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and the form established pursuant to Section 69508.5 for purposes of the California Dream Act.

(3) The Student Aid Commission shall provide, to the extent permissible pursuant to state and federal law, the California College Guidance Initiative, described in Section 10861, with the data necessary, as determined by the California College Guidance Initiative, in consultation with the department, to inform the educator reports available through the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform to improve educator access to the information needed to determine whether each individual pupil has successfully completed and submitted their Free Application for Federal
 Student Aid or California Dream Act application.

(4) Upon participation of a local educational agency in the California College Guidance Initiative’s implementation of transcript-informed accounts for pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform, and to the extent permissible pursuant to state and federal law, the California College Guidance Initiative shall provide pupil grade point average information necessary, for each participating pupil in the local educational agency, to ensure that each pupil successfully completes and submits their Free Application for Federal Student Aid or California Dream Act application, to the Student Aid Commission in accordance with the privacy requirements of the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(h) The Student Aid Commission shall, on or before July 1, 2022, adopt
 regulations that include, but are not limited to, model opt-out forms and acceptable use policies for the purpose of providing guidance on the requirements relating to state law in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e). The Student Aid Commission shall post and make available any model opt-out forms and policies established pursuant to this subdivision on its internet website.

(i) A pupil who does not fulfill the requirements of this section shall not be penalized or punished and this section shall not affect a pupil’s ability to graduate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 2.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.8.

(a) Commencing with the 2020–21 school year, the governing board of a school district and the governing body of a charter school, as appropriate, shall ensure that each of its pupils receives information on how to properly complete and submit the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or the California Dream Act application, as appropriate, at least once before the pupil enters grade 12. The manner in which information is provided pursuant to this section shall be at the discretion of the governing board of the school district or the governing body of the charter school, as appropriate, and may include, but not necessarily be limited to, information dissemination through in-class instruction, an existing program, family information sessions, or group or individual sessions with school counselors.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing with participation of a local educational agency in the California College Guidance Initiative’s implementation of universal basic pupil accounts on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform, and in furtherance of satisfying the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 51225.7, the governing board of a school district and the governing body of a charter school, as appropriate, shall ensure that each pupil in grade 11 is advised to complete the grade 11 financial aid lessons on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform operated by the California College Guidance Initiative pursuant to Section 10861.

 (c) The manner in which information is provided pursuant to subdivision (a) and the grade 11 financial aid lessons described in subdivision (b) shall be developed in partnership with the Student Aid Commission in order to ensure timely communication
 to pupils of changes in the process for applying for financial aid. A memorandum of understanding shall be established between the California College Guidance Initiative and the Student Aid Commission, detailing the partnership in creation of these lessons. These lessons are provided to pupils at the discretion of the governing board of the school district or the governing body of the charter school, as appropriate, and may include, but not be limited to, information dissemination through in-class instruction, an existing program, family information sessions, or group or individual sessions with school counselors. The grade 11 financial aid lessons provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, material related to all of the following:

(1) The types of documentation and personal information that each student financial aid application requires, including, but not necessarily limited to, documents relating
 to income taxes, finances and income, college choices, academic status, and personal identification such as social security or taxpayer identification numbers.

(2) An explanation of definitions used for each application. These definitions may include, but are not necessarily limited to, definitions of “legal guardianship,” “household size,” “parent,” “dependent,” and “taxable college grants and scholarships.”

(3) Eligibility requirements for student financial aid that may be applied for using the FAFSA or the California Dream Act Application.

(4) Application timelines and submission deadlines.

(5) The importance of submitting applications early, especially when student financial aid is awarded on a first-come, first-served basis.

(d) The governing board of a school district and the governing body of a charter school shall ensure that both of the following occurs:

(1) A paper copy of the FAFSA or the California Dream Act application is provided to each pupil, upon request by that pupil or upon request of a parent or guardian of that pupil.

(2) Commencing with participation of a local educational agency in the California College Guidance Initiative’s basic universal pupil accounts on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform, a representative of the school district and the charter school, as applicable, has a district administrator account registered on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform for purposes of this representative serving as the district administrator to support grade 11 pupils in completing the grade 11 financial aid lessons provided pursuant
 to this section.

(e) The governing board of a school district and the governing body of a charter school shall ensure that any information shared by parents, guardians, and pupils under this section is handled according to applicable state and federal privacy laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 63.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.9.

Notwithstanding any other law, if a pupil completed a career technical education course, between July 1, 2022, and the effective date of this section, that met the requirements of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3, as that section read on June 30, 2022, that course shall be deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 571, Sec. 37.   (AB 185)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall coordinate the development, on a cyclical basis, of model curriculum standards for the course of study required by Section 51225.3 and for a career technical education course of study necessary to assist school districts with complying with subdivision (b) of Section 51228. The superintendent shall set forth these standards in terms of a wide range of specific competencies, including higher level skills, in each academic subject area. The superintendent shall review currently available textbooks in conjunction with the curriculum standards. The superintendent shall seek the advice of classroom teachers, school administrators, parents, postsecondary educators, and representatives of business and industry in developing these curriculum standards. The superintendent shall recommend policies to the State Board of Education for consideration and adoption by the board. The State Board of Education shall adopt these policies no later than January 1, 1985. However, neither the superintendent nor the board shall adopt rules or regulations for course content or methods of instruction.

The superintendent shall, to the extent applicable, incorporate the integration of career technical and academic education into the development of curriculum standards for career technical education courses. The standards for a career technical education course of study shall be adopted no later than June 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 989, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.1.

(a) Upon adoption of the model curriculum standards developed pursuant to Section 51226, the Superintendent shall develop a curriculum framework consistent with criteria set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 60005 that offers a blueprint for implementation of career and technical education. The framework shall be adopted no later than November 1, 2006.

(b) In developing the framework, the Superintendent shall work in consultation and coordination with an advisory group, including, but not limited to, representatives from all of the following:

(1) Business and industry.

(2) Labor.

(3) The California Community Colleges.

(4) The University of California.

(5) The California State University.

(6) Classroom teachers.

(7) School administrators.

(8) Pupils.

(9) Parents and guardians.

(10) Representatives of the Legislature.

(11) The department.

(12) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(c) In convening the membership of the advisory group set forth in subdivision (b), the Superintendent is encouraged to seek representation broadly reflective of the state population.

(d) Costs incurred by the superintendent in complying with this section shall be covered, to the extent permitted by federal law, by the state administrative and leadership funds available pursuant to the Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Technical Education Act of 1998 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 et seq.).

(e) In developing the framework, the Superintendent shall consider developing frameworks for various career pathways that will prepare pupils for both career entry and matriculation into postsecondary education.

(f) Upon completion of the framework, the advisory group is encouraged to identify career technical education courses that meet state-adopted academic content standards and that satisfy high school graduation requirements and admissions requirements of the University of California and the California State University, and to determine the extent to which local educational agencies accept credit earned for the completion of those courses, in lieu of other courses of study.

(g) The adoption of the framework developed and adopted pursuant to this section by a local educational agency shall be voluntary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 37.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.2.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall inform county offices of education and each school district that maintains any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, of the availability of the consumer and home economics education model performance standards and framework. The superintendent shall provide a copy of the consumer and home economics education model performance standards and framework to each county office of education and school district that requests one.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1207, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.3.

(a) (1) The department shall incorporate into publications that provide examples of curriculum resources for teacher use those materials developed by publishers of nonfiction, trade books, and primary sources, or other public or private organizations, that are age appropriate and consistent with the subject frameworks on history and social science that deal with civil rights, human rights violations, genocide, slavery, and the Holocaust.

(2) The Legislature encourages the department to incorporate into publications that provide examples of curriculum resources for teacher use those materials developed by publishers of nonfiction, trade books, and primary
 sources, or other public or private organizations, that are age appropriate and consistent with the subject frameworks on history and social science that deal with the Armenian, Cambodian, Darfur, and Rwandan genocides.

(b) (1) The Legislature encourages the incorporation of survivor, rescuer, liberator, and witness oral testimony into the teaching of human rights, the Holocaust, and genocide, including, but not limited to, the Armenian, Cambodian, Darfur, and Rwandan genocides.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “oral testimony” means the firsthand accounts of significant historical events presented in a format that includes, but is not limited to, in-person testimony, video, or a multimedia option, such as a DVD or an online video.

(c) The Legislature encourages all state and local professional development activities to provide teachers with content background and resources to assist them in teaching about civil rights, human rights violations, genocide, slavery, the Armenian Genocide, and the Holocaust.

(d) The Legislature encourages all state and local professional development activities to provide teachers with content background and resources to assist them in teaching about the Great Irish Famine of 1845–50.

(e) The Great Irish Famine of 1845–50 shall be considered in the next cycle in which the history-social science curriculum framework and its accompanying instructional materials are adopted.

(f) (1) The Legislature encourages all state and local professional development activities to provide teachers with content background and resources to assist them in teaching about the Chinese Exclusion Act of 1882 and the contributions of Chinese Americans to the establishment of the transcontinental railroad.

(2) When the state board revises and adopts the curriculum framework for history-social science on or after January 1, 2017, the state board shall consider providing for the inclusion, in that curriculum framework, evaluation criteria, and accompanying instructional materials, of instruction on the Chinese Exclusion Act of 1882 and the contributions of Chinese Americans to the establishment of the transcontinental railroad.

(g) When the
 history-social science curriculum framework is revised as required by law, the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider including the Armenian, Cambodian, Darfur, and Rwandan genocides in the recommended history-social science curriculum framework.

(h) The Model Curriculum for Human Rights and Genocide adopted by the state board, pursuant to Section 51226, shall be made available to schools in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, as soon as funding is available for this purpose. In addition, the department shall make the curriculum available on its internet website.

(i) For purposes of this article, “Armenian Genocide” means the torture, starvation, and murder of 1,500,000 Armenians, which included death marches into the Syrian Desert, by the rulers of the Ottoman Turkish Empire and
 the exile of more than 500,000 innocent people during the period from 1915 to 1923, inclusive.

(j) When the state board revises and adopts the curriculum framework for history-social science on or after January 1, 2016, the state board shall consider providing for the inclusion, in that curriculum framework, evaluation criteria, and accompanying instructional materials, of instruction on the unconstitutional deportation to Mexico during the Great Depression of citizens and lawful permanent residents of the United States.

(k) As used in subdivisions (b) and (c), “human rights” and “human rights violations” include the unconstitutional deportation to Mexico during the Great Depression of citizens and lawful permanent residents of the United States.

(l) When the history-social science curriculum framework is next revised on or after January 1, 2024, the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider providing for inclusion, in that curriculum framework, related evaluation criteria, and accompanying instructional materials, of instruction on both of the following:

(1) The historical, social, economic, and political contributions of Asian Americans, Native Hawaiians, and Pacific Islanders in the United States.

(2) Examples of racism, discrimination, and violence perpetrated against Asian Americans, Native Hawaiians, and Pacific Islanders in the United States, including, but not limited to, hate crimes committed during the COVID-19 pandemic.

(m) When the state board next revises the history-social science curriculum framework or adopts new instructional materials, after January 1, 2025, the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider, in consultation with California tribes, including in that curriculum framework or including in its evaluation criteria for instructional materials, content on the treatment and perspectives of Native Americans during the periods of the Spanish colonization of California and the Gold Rush Era.

(n) When the state board adopts new instructional materials for history-social science on or after January 1, 2025, the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider providing for inclusion, in its evaluation criteria, content on the case of Mendez v. Westminster School District of Orange
 County (64 F. Supp. 544 (S.D. Cal. 1946)), aff’d, Westminster School District of Orange County v. Mendez (161 F. 2d 774 (9th Cir. 1947)).

(o) When the state board next revises the history-social science curriculum framework or adopts new instructional materials, after January 1, 2026, the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider including in that curriculum framework or including in its evaluation criteria for instructional materials, content on the historical, social, economic, and political contributions of African Americans during the Spanish colonization of California, the Gold Rush Era, and Antebellum, including, but not limited to, addressing African Americans’ experience with discriminatory laws, barriers to land ownership, and their efforts to establish economic and social stability in
 California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   (SB 510)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.4.

Pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 51226.3, the Legislature encourages all of the following:

(a) Instruction in the origins of genocide as a phenomenon throughout history that continues to the present day.

(b) Content providers and teachers to promote pupil analysis of genocides, including the ethnic, religious, and political causes.

(c) Content providers and teachers to incorporate instructional materials for pupils that examine the possible means of preventing and halting genocide policies or interventions by the United Nations, other groups of nations, or the United States.

(d) Examinations of interventions to prevent genocides should include arguments and evidence for and against intervention, the role of public support for the intervention, and the possible consequences of such interventions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 441, Sec. 2.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

51226.5.

(a) No later than January 1, 1991, the State Board of Education, with the assistance of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, shall establish a list of textbooks and other instructional materials that highlight the contributions of minorities in the development of California and the United States.

(b) No later than April 1, 1991, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make that list of textbooks and instructional materials available for use by school districts throughout the state, and shall submit the list to the Legislature.
